District of Columbia statutes.
26-740

Enforcement.

If the Superintendent [Commissioner] determines that any law of the District has been violated in the operation of a branch in the District of an out-of-state state bank, or that such branch is being operated in an unsafe or unsound manner pursuant to this subchapter, the Superintendent [Commissioner] shall have the authority to undertake such enforcement actions as it would be permitted to take if the branch were a District state bank.

History

June 13, 1996, D.C. Law 11-142, § 11, 43 DCR 2159

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 26-860.